Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1319

Alternative means of approval of conversion or merger.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of a domestic cooperative association, approval of a conversion or merger under this subchapter by the affirmative vote or consent of all its interest holders satisfies the requirements of this subchapter for approval of the conversion or merger.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1319.]